Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1956YH (2) 91 jm/md H.F. 294 Section 1. Section 384.12, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. a. A tax for support of a public 3 library in an amount not to exceed the amount levied by the 4 city in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022, for the support 5 of a public library. 6 b. A tax under this subsection shall not be imposed unless 7 the city council submits the question of whether to levy the 8 tax to the voters at a regular city election, and a majority 9 approve the levy. 10 c. A tax imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be valid 11 for ten years from the date the tax is approved by voters at a 12 regular city election but may be reauthorized for additional 13 ten-year periods if approved by a majority of voters at a 14 regular city election. 15 d. A city council may discontinue a tax imposed under this 16 subsection by a majority vote of the city council. 17